Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-114
Farm trailer, defined.

Farm trailer means a trailer or semitrailer belonging to a farmer or rancher and used wholly and exclusively to carry supplies to or from the owner's farm or ranch, used by a farmer or rancher to carry his or her own agricultural products as defined in section 60-304 to or from storage or market, or used by a farmer or rancher for hauling of supplies or agricultural products in exchange of services.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 14;

Laws 2007, LB286, § 3.